Maine, session 132, LD363.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
CONCEPT DRAFT
SUMMARY
This bill is a concept draft pursuant to Joint Rule 208.
This bill would authorize a General Fund bond issue in order to create the School
Capital Improvement Fund. The fund would be available to any school district, subject to
eligibility criteria such as the condition and age of the school facility to be renovated or
replaced. Funds would be available to school districts on a one-to-one matching basis.
Page 1 - 132LR2256(01)